Alaska statutes. Title 3. Agriculture, Animals, and Food.
Article 1. Dogs.

Sec. 03.55.010.
Killing of vicious or mad dog authorized.

Any person may lawfully kill any vicious or mad dog running at large.

History.

(§ 33-3-91 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For power of a municipality to regulate licensing, impounding, and disposition of animals, see AS

29.35.200(b)

and

29.35.210(a)

and (b).

Administrative Code. —

For state park land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 12, art. 1.

Sec. 03.55.020.
Vicious dogs.

Any dog which when unprovoked has ever bitten or attacked a human being is considered vicious within the meaning of AS

03.55.010

.

History.

(§ 33-3-92 ACLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For state park land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 12, art. 1.

Sec. 03.55.030.
Dogs that annoy or bite animals or birds.

Whenever any dog habitually annoys any wild deer, reindeer, sheep, cattle, horse, or other animal or bird either domestic or wild, or evinces a disposition which makes it likely that it will without provocation bite an animal or fowl, any person may lawfully kill the dog, when at large.
The owner or keeper of the dog, if known or reasonably identifiable, shall be notified and given reasonable opportunity to restrain the dog before it is lawful to kill it.
Persons authorized to enforce AS 16.05 (Alaska Fish and Game Code) and peace officers may enforce this section.

History.

(§ 33-3-93 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For power of a municipality to regulate licensing, impounding, and disposition of animals, see AS

29.35.200(b)

and

29.35.210(a)

and (b).

Administrative Code. —

For state park land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 12, art. 1.

Secs. 03.55.040 — 03.55.060.
Dog control by governmental units. [Repealed, § 9 ch 109 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 03.55.070.
Power of village council to control dogs.

A village council duly elected by residents of an unincorporated village not within an organized borough may destroy loose dogs in the village and may otherwise control dogs to the extent authorized first class cities.

The council may impose and enforce the provisions of a dog control ordinance in the total area within 20 miles of the village. The ordinance must generally describe the area in which it is imposed. If two villages having dog control ordinances lie within 40 miles of each other, the jurisdiction of each village terminates at a point midway between them.

History.

(§ 4 ch 120 SLA 1962; am § 7 ch 109 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as 18.75.040. Renumbered in 1986.

Cross references. —

For power of municipalities to regulate licensing, impounding, and disposition of animals, see AS

29.35.200(b)

and

29.35.210(a)

and (b); for powers of first class cities, see AS

29.35.250

and

29.35.260

.

Collateral references. —

3B C.J.S., Animals, §§ 12-20, 417 et seq.

Police power as authorizing statute providing for destruction of dogs. 56 ALR2d 1024.

Construction and application of ordinances relating to unrestrained dogs, cats, or other domesticated animals. 1 ALR4th 994.